Hawaii, session 2025, SB670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that single-use plastics are goods made from fossil fuel-based petrochemicals that are intended to be disposed of shortly after use.  Single-use plastics are an example of a throwaway culture that prioritizes convenience over durability and sustainability.  Globally, around three hundred million tons of plastic are produced each year, even though less than ten per cent of plastics ever produced have been recycled.  Instead, discarded plastics wind up in landfills, incinerators, and the environment, ultimately breaking apart into tiny toxic pieces called microplastics that contaminate water, food, and even air.  Plastic pollution is a major threat to the ocean, the environment, and human health.  Furthermore, according to a 2021 report from Beyond Plastics, a nonprofit advocacy group aiming to end plastic pollution, the plastic industry is on track to overtake coal as a significant source of atmospheric greenhouse gas emissions. The legislature further finds that hotels and other lodging establishments in the State frequently provide complimentary toiletries that are packaged in single-use plastic containers.  This does not align with the Hawaii tourism authority's strategic plan, which cites the goals of promoting sustainable tourism, preserving natural resources, and advocating for responsible tourism practices that minimize negative environmental impacts.  Some hotels in the State have already transitioned away from single-use plastics, instead providing bulk dispensers for personal care products or complimentary toiletries in packaging made of sustainable materials.  Therefore, the legislature finds that there is an opportunity to reduce harmful plastic waste in Hawaii while making the visitor industry more sustainable.  The legislature also finds that California, Illinois, New York, and Washington have passed laws to phase out single plastic use toiletries in hotels. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit lodging establishments in the State from providing personal care products that are packaged in small plastic containers in certain spaces of the lodging establishment. SECTION 2. Chapter 342H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§342H-    Personal care products; small plastic containers; lodging establishments; prohibited.  (a)  Beginning on: (1)  January 1, 2027, for lodging establishments with more than fifty sleeping room accommodations; and (2)  January 1, 2029, for lodging establishments with fifty or fewer sleeping room accommodations, no lodging establishment shall provide personal care products packaged in small plastic containers to any person staying in a sleeping room accommodation, in any space within a sleeping room accommodation, or in any bathroom used by the public or guests. (b)  A lodging establishment may: (1)  Use bulk dispensers of personal care products; and (2)  Provide personal care products packaged in a container made from non-plastic materials to an individual, upon request, at a place other than: (A)  A sleeping room accommodation; (B)  A space within a sleeping room accommodation; or (C)  In a bathroom used by the public or guests. (c)  The department may inspect any sleeping room accommodation and bathroom used by the public or guests of a lodging establishment and shall issue a citation for any violation of subsection (a).  Any lodging establishment that violates subsection (a) shall be subject to a civil penalty of $500 for the first violation and $2,000 for a second or subsequent violation.  The attorney general may bring an action to impose a civil penalty pursuant to this subsection.  Each day of continued violation under this section shall constitute a separate and distinct offense for which the lodging establishment may be penalized. (d)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the enactment or implementation of any county ordinance that is more stringent than this section. (e)  The department may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to implement this section. (f)  For the purposes of this section: "Lodging establishment" means an establishment that contains one or more sleeping room accommodations that are rented or otherwise provided to the public, including a hotel, condominium hotel, motel, resort, bed and breakfast home, transient vacation rental, transient accommodations, or hosted rental.  "Lodging establishment" does not include a hospital, nursing home, residential retirement community, prison, jail, correctional facility, homeless shelter, boarding school, worker housing, or long-term rental home. "Personal care product" means shampoo, hair conditioner, or bath soap. "Plastic" means any synthetic material made from organic polymers, such as polyethylene, polyvinyl chloride, or nylon, that can be molded into shape while soft and then set into a rigid or slightly elastic form.  "Plastic" includes all materials identified with resin codes one to seven, as provided in section 342H-42. "Small plastic container" means a plastic bottle or other container that has a capacity of six ounces or less and is not intended to be reused by the end user. "Transient accommodations" shall have the same meaning as in section 237D-1." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________